Illinois, session 104th, HB2707.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by adding Sections 510-20.88 and 34-18.88 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/10-20.88 new)7    Sec. 10-20.88. Parking passes for students with 8disabilities. The school board of each school district 9maintaining a high school shall require the high school to 10prioritize granting school parking passes to students with 11disabilities who have a disability license plate or parking 12decal or device by ensuring that these students are able to 13park an accessible distance from the high school's entrance 14and are given first consideration (i) before assigning 15students school parking passes and (ii) after assigning 16students school parking passes for those students with 17disabilities who receive a disability license plate or parking 18decal or device after students have been assigned school 19parking passes. 20    (105 ILCS 5/34-18.88 new)21    Sec. 34-18.88. Parking passes for students with 22disabilities. The board shall require each high school to   HB2707- 2 -LRB104 09455 LNS 19516 b1prioritize granting school parking passes to students with 2disabilities who have a disability license plate or parking 3decal or device by ensuring that these students are able to 4park an accessible distance from the high school's entrance 5and are given first consideration (i) before assigning 6students school parking passes and (ii) after assigning 7students school parking passes for those students with 8disabilities who receive a disability license plate or parking 9decal or device after students have been assigned school 10parking passes. 11    Section 10. The Public Higher Education Act is amended by 12adding Section 18 as follows: 13    (110 ILCS 167/18 new)14    Sec. 18. Parking passes for students with disabilities. 15The governing board of each public institution of higher 16education shall prioritize granting parking passes to students 17with disabilities who have a disability license plate or 18parking decal or device by ensuring that these students are 19able to park an accessible distance from a building's entrance 20and are given first consideration (i) before assigning 21students parking passes and (ii) after assigning students 22parking passes for those students with disabilities who 23receive a disability license plate or parking decal or device 24after students have been assigned parking passes.